test/src/morphology/N-akaatwb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - akātõb: # Noun 159 'eng /est käepide/fin' - full paradigm
     akātõb+N+Sg+Nom: akātõb
     akātõb+N+Sg+Gen: akātõb
     akātõb+N+Sg+Par: akātõbt
     akātõb+N+Sg+Dat: akātõbõn
     akātõb+N+Sg+Ins: akātõbõks
     akātõb+N+Sg+Ill: akātõbõ
     akātõb+N+Sg+Ela: akātõbst
     akātõb+N+Pl+Nom: akātõbõd
     akātõb+N+Pl+Gen: akātõbõd
     akātõb+N+Pl+Par: akātõbidi
     akātõb+N+Pl+Dat: akātõbõdõn
     akātõb+N+Pl+Ins: akātõbõdõks
     akātõb+N+Pl+Ill: akātõbiž
     akātõb+N+Pl+Ela: akātõbist
